Utah statutes.
78B-14-602.   Procedure to register order for enforcement.
(1)  A support order or income-withholding order of another state may be
registered in this state by sending the following records and information to
the appropriate tribunal in this state:
(a)  a letter of transmittal to the tribunal requesting registration and
enforcement;
(b)  two copies, including one certified copy, of the order to be registered,
including any modification of the order;
(c)  a sworn statement by the person requesting registration or a certified
statement by the custodian of the records showing the amount of any arrearage;
(d)  the name of the obligor and, if known:
(i)  the obligor's address and Social Security number;
(ii)  the name and address of the obligor's employer and any other source of
income of the obligor; and
(iii)  a description and the location of property of the obligor in this state
not exempt from execution; and
(e)  except as otherwise provided in Section 78B-14-312, the name and address
of the obligee and, if applicable, the person to whom support payments are to
be remitted.
(2)  On receipt of a request for registration, the registering tribunal shall
cause the order to be filed as a foreign judgment, together with one copy of
the documents and information, regardless of their form.
(3)  A petition seeking a remedy that must be affirmatively sought under law
of this state may be filed at the same time as the request for registration or
later.  The pleading must specify the grounds for the remedy sought.
(4)  If two or more orders are in effect, the person requesting registration
shall:
(a)  furnish to the tribunal a copy of every support order asserted to be in
effect in addition to the documents specified in this section;
(b)  specify the order alleged to be the controlling order, if any; and
(c)  specify the amount of consolidated arrears, if any.
(5)  A request for a determination of which is the controlling order may be
filed separately or with a request for registration and enforcement or for
registration and modification.  The person requesting registration shall give
notice of the request to each party whose rights may be affected by the
determination.
